test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-list_od_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - list: # from dictionary
  
    vasmođ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: vasmoh
    mostođ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: mostoh
    mulžođ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: mulžoh
    pulžođ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: pulžoh
    snippođ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: snipoi
    ruibođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ruibom
    suibođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: suuibom
    turbođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: turbom
    rubbođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: rubom
    puiccođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: puuicom
    tulccođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tulcom
    canccođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: cancom
    cipcođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: cipcom
    harccođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: harcom
    pirccođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pircom
    purccođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: purcom
    uccođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ucom
    kobdođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kobdom
    huidođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: huidom
    šaldođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: šaldom
    šlundođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: šlundom
    rundođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: rundom
    turdođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: turdom
    ruddođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: rudom
    faggođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: fagom
    laigođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: laigom
    riggođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: rigom
    šiggođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: šigom
    lijgođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: liijgom
    hilgođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hilgom
    mulgođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: mulgom
    šloggođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: šlogom
    moggođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: mogom
    cirgođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: cirgom
    snjirgođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: snjirgom
    čirgođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čirgom
    jorgođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: jorgom
    njurgođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njurgom
    ravgođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ravgom
    šlivgođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: šlivgom
    fiŋgođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: fiŋgom
    riŋgođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: riŋgom
    snuđgođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: snuđgom
    likkođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: lihom
    sikkođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sihom
    holhođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: holhom
    šlokkođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: šlohom
    pokkođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pohom
    stokkođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: stohom
    kukkođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuhom
    kiljođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kiljom
    moljođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: moljom
    rimnjođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: rimnjom
    vinnjoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vinjom
    skurnjođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: skurnjom
    luvnjođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: luvnjom
    roččoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: rojom
    sorjođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sorjom
    luččoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: lujom
    rikkođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: rikom
    faskođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: faskom
    paskođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: paskom
    njiskođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njiskom
    liskođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: liskom
    oskođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: oskom
    kiškođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kiškom
    piškođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: piškom
    riškođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: riškom
    tiškođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tiškom
    čiŋkkođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čiŋkom
    rimškođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: rimškom
    huškođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: huškom
    njuškođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njuškom
    tuškođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tuškom
    jallođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: jalom
    njalloođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njalom
    salloođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: salom
    koblođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: koblom
    kihlođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kihlom
    juhlođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: juhlom
    millođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: milom
    silloođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: silom
    suilođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: suuilom
    villođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vilom
    kolloođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kolom
    čolloođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čolom
    njivlođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njivlom
    kovlođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kovlom
    kijmođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kiijmom
    julmođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: julmom
    lommoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: lomom
    čommoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čomom
    skođmođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: skođmom
    ruhnođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ruhnom
    rinnoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: rinom
    uinođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: uuinom
    lonnoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: lonom
    ponnoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ponom
    skarnođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: skarnom
    kirnođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kirnom
    škurnođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: škurnom
    kappođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kapom
    lippođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: lipom
    rippođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ripom
    silppođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: silpom
    vilppođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vilpom
    limppođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: limpom
    kurppođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kurpom
    jarroođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: jarom
    jarrođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: jarom
    irroođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: irom
    sirroođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sirom
    orroođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: orom
    šnurroođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: šnurom
    kavrođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kaavrom
    assoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: asom
    kassoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kasom
    nissoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nisom
    pissoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pisom
    vijsođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: viijsom
    molsođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: molsom
    occoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: osom
    koccoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kosom
    lossoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: losom
    noccoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nosom
    possoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: posom
    nurssođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nursom
    russoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: rusom
    mittođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: mitom
    polttođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: poltom
    njirttođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njirtom
    hurttođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hurtom
    čurttođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čurtom
    fastođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: fastom
    navvoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: navom
    vahhoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vavom
    njihhoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njivom
    livvoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: livom
    tivvoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tivom
    olvođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: olvom
    kovvoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kovom
    rohhoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: rovom
    čohhoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čovom
    šohhoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: šovom
    nirvođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nirvom
    hurvođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hurvom
    nurvođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nurvom
    čurvođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čurvom
    kazzođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kazom
    livzođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: livzom
    fađđoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: fađom
    raššoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: rašom
    raččođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: račom
    sattoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sađom
    libžođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: libžom
    kobđođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kobđom
    hittoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hiđom
    šiđđoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: šiđom
    stilččođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: stilčom
    vilššođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vilšom
    pulččođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pulčom
    rimččođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: rimčom
    tinžođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tinžom
    koččođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kočom
    lipčođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: lipčom
    tipšođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tipšom
    porššođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: poršom
    huttoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: huđom
    puigođ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: puuigoon
    stirccođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: stircco
    piccoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pico
    lonnjoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: lonjo
    sonnjoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sonjo
    loijoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: lojo
    šlokkođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šlokko
    pokkođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pokko
    stokkođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: stokko
    nivkkođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nivkko
    čiŋkkođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čiŋkko
    čolloođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čolo
    pimmoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pimo
    kummoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kumo
    innoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ino
    orroođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: oro
    šnurroođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šnuro
    kassoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kaso
    nurssođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nursso
    russoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ruso
    sattoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sato
    čođđoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čođo
    paččođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: paččo
    stulččođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: stulččo
    skođmođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skođmo
    skođmođ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: skuđmuu
